Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 6
P

RESCRIBED BURNING

12-6-145. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Prescribed Burning Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-6-145

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2405, § 1.)

12-6-146. Legislative findings and purpose.

It is declared by the General Assembly that prescribed burning is a resource protection and land management tool which benefits the safety of the public, Georgia's forest resources, the environment, and the economy of the state. The General Assembly finds that:

Prescribed burning reduces naturally occurring vegetative fuels within forested areas. Reduction of such fuels by burning reduces the risk and severity of major wildfire, thereby lessening the threat of fire and the resulting loss of life and property;

Georgia's ever-increasing population situates urban development directly adjacent to fire prone forest lands. The use of prescribed fire to manage fuels in interface areas would substantially reduce the threat of damaging wildfire in urban communities;

Forest land constitutes significant economic, biological, and aesthetic resources of state-wide importance. Prescribed burning on forest land serves to reduce hazardous accumulations of fuels, prepare sites for both natural and artificial forest regeneration, improve wildlife habitat, control insects and disease, and perpetuate fire dependent ecosystems;

State and federally owned public use lands such as state parks, state and national forests, and wildlife refuges receive resource enhancement through use of prescribed burning;

As Georgia's population continues to grow, pressures from liability issues and smoke nuisance complaints cause prescribed burn practitioners to limit prescribed burn activity, thus reducing the above-mentioned benefits to the state;

Public misunderstanding of the benefit of prescribed burning to the ecological and economic welfare of the state exerts unusual pressures that prevent uninhibited use of this valuable forest resource management tool; and

Fire benefits rare, threatened, and endangered plants, deer, turkey, quail, dove, and other game as well as numerous songbirds and other nongame species by the increased growth and yields of herbs and legumes. It also allows openings for feeding and travel.

It is the purpose of this part to authorize and promote the continued use of prescribed burning for community protection, silvicultural, environmental, and wildlife management purposes.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-146

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2405, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1285, § 4.)

12-6-147. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Commission" means the State Forestry Commission.

"Prescribed burning" means the controlled application of fire to existing vegetative fuels under specified environmental conditions and following appropriate precautionary measures, which causes the fire to be confined to a predetermined area and accomplishes one or more planned land management objectives or to mitigate catastrophic wildfires.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-147

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2405, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1285, § 5.)

12-6-148. Requirements for prescribed burning; limitation on liability.

Prescribed burning conducted under the requirements of this part shall:

Be accomplished only when an individual with previous prescribed burning experience or training is in charge of the burn and is present on site until the fire is adequately confined to reasonably prevent escape of the fire from the area intended to be burned;

Be considered in the public interest and shall not create a public or private nuisance;

Be considered a property right of the landowner; and

Be conducted in accordance with a permit issued under Part 3 of this article.

No property owner or owner's agent conducting an authorized prescribed burn under this part shall be liable for damages or injury caused by fire or resulting smoke unless it is proven that there was gross negligence in starting, controlling, or completing the burn.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-148

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2405, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1285, § 6.)

12-6-149. Fire manager program authorized; record-keeping requirements; public information campaign.

The commission may promulgate a certified prescribed fire manager program whereby practitioners may become qualified and registered under this part.

The commission shall utilize the same or similar record-keeping requirements of Part 3 of this article, the "Georgia Forest Fire Protection Act," to reflect the use of prescribed burning under this part.

The commission shall, subject to sufficient funding, institute a public information campaign in an effort to reveal the benefits of prescribed burning to the general public.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-149

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2405, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1285, § 7.)